Maine, session 132, LD1010.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1751, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
1. Inspection required. Except as provided in this chapter or section 2307, subsection
1, a motor vehicle required to be registered in this State must have an annual inspection
every other year. A person may have a motor vehicle inspected more frequently.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1751, sub-§2-A, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 786, §1, is
amended to read:
2-A. Enhanced inspection. Beginning January 1, 1999, a motor vehicle that is
required to be registered in Cumberland County and that is subject to inspection pursuant
to subsection 1 must have an annual enhanced inspection every other year. The following
equipment is subject to inspection:
A. Equipment subject to inspection pursuant to subsection 2;
B. The fuel tank cap on 1974 and subsequent models of gasoline-powered vehicles;
and
C. The on-board diagnostic system on 1996 and subsequent models.
A motor vehicle that is not required to be registered in Cumberland County may have an
enhanced inspection under this subsection.